Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-1209 Duties of clerk and
distribution. The clerk shall make diligent effort to ascertain the names
and whereabouts of the heirs, or the whereabouts of the devisees of the
decedent and present evidence relating thereto to the court having jurisdiction
of the proceedings. After the expiration of four months, in the case of an
estate valued in excess of $10,000, or sixty days, in the case of an estate
valued at $10,000 or less, after the first publication, the clerk shall pay or
distribute the money, funds, or property of the estate in the order specified
in section 560:3-805, including any allowances and exempt property under part 4
of article II authorized by the court, and the excess, if any, to or among such
persons as may be found by the court to be persons entitled thereto as
distributees. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next